Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
184

STATE
PARKS AND RECREATION AREAS

Part I. State Parks

Section

184-1 Definitions

184-2 State park system

184-3 Powers of department

184-3.4 State parks special fund

184-3.5 Park acquisition trust fund; "acquire
a park" program

184-4 Repealed

184-4.5 Smoking or use of tobacco products
prohibited

184-5 Rules and enforcement; penalty

184-5.1 Arrest

184-5.2 Summons or citations

184-5.3 Failure to obey summons

184-5.5 General administrative penalties

184-6 Duties of department

184-7 County contributions

184-8 Budget

Part II. State Resort Camps and
Services--Repealed

184-11 to 15 Repealed

Part III. National Parks

184-21 Acquisition and conveyance of lands for
National Parks

Part IV. Aina Hoomalu State Parks

184-31 Aina hoomalu state parks program
established;

designation of aina hoomalu sites

184-32 Repealed

Note

Department of transportation's bridge rehabilitation and
replacement program; temporary exemption from certain construction requirements
of this chapter through June 30, 2017 or until completion. L 2012, c 218.

Cross References

Environmental courts, jurisdiction over proceedings arising
under this chapter, see §604A-2.

Koke‘e state park advisory council, see §171-8.5.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next